Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Tourism Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 45.81.100.
Creation of a tourism revolving fund.

There is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development a tourism revolving fund. All principal and interest payments, and money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

, shall be paid into the tourism revolving fund.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1972; am §§ 82, 83 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.010. Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For annual appropriation of cash balance attributable to loans owned by the fund, see § 3, ch. 156, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.81.110.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the tourism revolving fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

45.81.120

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 27 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.015.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.120

” was substituted for “AS 45.90.020”.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.81.120.
Powers and duties of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The department may

make loans to a business directly involved in the tourist industry;

designate agents and delegate powers to them as is necessary;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out its functions, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided and charges for collecting the fees;

establish amortization plans for the repayment of loans not to exceed 20 years;

collect the fees and collection charges established under this subsection.

[Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1972; am § 84 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.020.
Renumbered in 2006.

Section 71(2), ch. 106, SLA 1980 provides that no further loans may be made under this section after July 1, 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 45.81.130.
Limitations on loans.

State participation in a loan to a business may not be more than $3,000,000.

The loan shall be secured by acceptable collateral and may not exceed 75 percent of the appraised value of the collateral offered as security.

The rate of interest may not exceed nine and one-half percent a year on the unpaid balance of the state’s share of the loan.

A loan of $150,000 or more under AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

must be participated in by a financial institution in an amount which is not less than 20 percent of the total amount of the loan. A loan of less than $150,000 does not require participation by a financial institution.

The participating financial institution shall administer and service the loan for a reasonable fee not exceeding one-half of one percent.

The lien of the state is a first lien to the extent of its portion of the total loan and the participating financial institution shall have a first lien to the extent of its portion of the total loan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 4 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 139 SLA 1977; am § 23 ch 72 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.030. Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 45.81.140.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may sell or transfer at par value or at a premium or discount to any bank or other private purchaser for cash or other consideration the mortgages and notes held by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development as security for loans made under AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

.

[Repealed by § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1974; am § 24 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.040. Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.81.190.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

.
Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 28 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.90.050. Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.100

—

45.81.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.